Utah statutes.
16-16-1009.   Alternative distribution of unclaimed property, distributions, redemptions, or payments.

A limited cooperative association may distribute unclaimed property, distributions, redemptions, or payments by complying with Section 3-1-11.



Enacted by Chapter 363, 2008 General Session

